Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 4
PROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY -
JUDGMENTS AND CONVICTIONS

42-7-401. Proof required on judgments.

The director shall also suspend the license issued to any person upon receiving an affidavit from the judgment creditor that such person has failed for a period of thirty days to satisfy any final judgment in amounts and upon a cause of action as stated in this article, or, in a criminal proceeding arising from the use or operation of a motor vehicle, has failed to comply with the terms of any order of restitution made as a condition of probation pursuant to section 18-1.3-205, C.R.S.

The judgment referred to means a final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction in any state or of the United States against a person as defendant upon a cause of action as stated in this article.

The judgment referred to means any final judgment for damage to property in excess of one hundred dollars or for damages in any amount for or on account of bodily injury to or death of any person resulting from the operation of any motor vehicle upon a highway.

This article shall not apply to any such judgment rendered against this state or any political subdivision thereof or any municipality therein.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2480, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 1216, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1564, § 378, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-7-402. Suspension, duration, bankruptcy.

The suspension required in section 42-7-401 shall remain in effect and no new license shall be issued to such person unless and until such judgment is satisfied or vacated or execution therein stayed and proof of financial responsibility given, except under the conditions stated in this article.

A discharge in bankruptcy following the rendering of any such judgment shall relieve the judgment debtor from any of the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2480, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-403. Sufficiency of payments.

Every judgment referred to in this article and for the purposes of this article shall be deemed satisfied:

When twenty-five thousand dollars has been credited upon any judgment rendered in excess of that amount for or on account of bodily injury to or the death of one person as the result of any one accident; or

When, subject to said limit of twenty-five thousand dollars as to one person, the sum of fifty thousand dollars has been credited upon any judgment rendered in excess of that amount for or on account of bodily injury to or the death of more than one person as the result of any one accident; or

When fifteen thousand dollars has been credited upon any judgment rendered in excess of that amount for damage to property of others in excess of one hundred dollars as a result of any one accident; or

When six years have elapsed since the date that such judgment became final; or

When three years, or such other period as authorized pursuant to section 42-7-408 (1), have elapsed since the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility; except that this paragraph (e) shall not apply to any judgment debtor subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

Credit for such amounts shall be deemed a satisfaction of any such judgment in excess of said amounts only for the purposes of this article.

Whenever payment has been made in settlement of any claims for bodily injury, death, or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident resulting in injury, death, or property damage to two or more persons in such accident, any such payment shall be credited in reduction of the amounts provided for in this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2480, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(d) amended, p. 709, § 4, effective May 23; (1)(d) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 1217, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(d) by Senate Bill 95-131 and House Bill 95-1156 were harmonized.

42-7-404. Payment of judgment in installments.

The director shall not suspend a license and shall restore any suspended license following nonpayment of a final judgment when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains an order from the trial court in which such judgment was rendered permitting the payment of such judgment in installments of not less than twenty-five dollars per month, while the payment of any said installment is not in default.

A judgment debtor upon five days' notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the trial court in which the judgment was obtained for the privilege of paying such judgment in installments, and the court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may so order, fixing the amounts and times of, and the person to receive, payment of the installments.

In the event the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as permitted by the order of the court, upon notice of such default supported by an appropriate document from the court or by sworn affidavit of either the judgment creditor or the person designated to receive payments, the director shall immediately suspend the license of the judgment debtor until said judgment is satisfied as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2481, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1217, § 6, effective July 1.

42-7-405. Suspension upon second judgment.

After one judgment is satisfied and proof of financial responsibility is given as required in this article and another such judgment is rendered against the judgment debtor for any accident occurring prior to the date of the giving of said proof and such person fails to satisfy the latter judgment within the amounts specified in this article within thirty days after the same becomes final, the director shall again suspend the license of such judgment debtor and shall not renew the same nor issue to the judgment debtor any license while such latter judgment remains in effect and unsatisfied within the amounts specified in this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2481, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-406. Proof required under certain conditions.

Whenever the director revokes the license of any person under section 42-2-125 or 42-2-126, or cancels any license under section 42-2-122 because of the licensee's inability to operate a motor vehicle because of physical or mental incompetence, or cancels any probationary license under section 42-2-127, the director shall not issue to or continue in effect for any such person any new or renewal of license until permitted under the motor vehicle laws of this state, and not then until and unless such person files or has filed and maintains proof of financial responsibility as provided in this article; except that persons whose licenses are canceled pursuant to section 42-2-122 (2.5), revoked pursuant to section 42-2-125 (1)(m), or revoked for a first offense under section 42-2-125 (1)(g.5) or a first offense under section 42-2-126 (3)(b) or (3)(e) shall not be required to file proof of financial responsibility in order to be relicensed.

(1.5) (a) Whenever the director revokes the license of a person under section 42-2-126 (3)(a), (3)(c), or (3)(d) for a second or subsequent offense and such person was driving the same vehicle in two or more of such offenses but did not own such vehicle, the director shall mail a notice to the owner of the vehicle pursuant to section 42-2-119 (2). In such notice, the director shall inform the owner that:

The operator of the motor vehicle owned by the owner has been involved in multiple alcohol-related driving violations while operating the owner's vehicle;

Because of the risks to the public connected with the use of the vehicle in alcohol-related driving violations, it is necessary for the motor vehicle owner to establish proof of financial responsibility;

Within thirty days after the date of mailing of the notice, the owner is required to file proof of financial responsibility for the future pursuant to the requirements of section 42-7-408 or to request a hearing regarding the applicability of this requirement to the owner;

The vehicle owner is entitled to a hearing and judicial review pursuant to section 42-7-201;

If the owner has not filed proof of financial responsibility or requested a hearing within thirty days after the date of mailing of the notice, the department will suspend the driver's license or nonresident operating privilege of the owner.

If proof of financial responsibility for the future is required under this subsection (1.5), such proof shall be maintained for a period of three years as required by section 42-7-408 (1)(b).

This subsection (1.5) does not apply to a motor vehicle that is:

Rented from a person, firm, corporation, or other business entity whose primary business is the rental of motor vehicles; or

Rented or loaned from a person, firm, corporation, or other business entity whose primary business is operation as a motor vehicle repair facility and who is providing such motor vehicle to the person while a motor vehicle is being repaired.

Whenever the director suspends the license of any person under section 42-2-127, the director shall not issue a probationary license to such person, nor shall the director at the termination of such person's period of suspension reinstate, reissue, renew, or issue a new license to such person unless such person furnishes the director evidence of insurance to show that the person is then insured, unless such person has deposited or deposits money or securities as provided in section 42-7-418.

Evidence of insurance required pursuant to this subsection (2) does not require the use of the form known as the "SR-22" or any substantially similar form.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2481, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 709, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1536, § 1, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1388, § 9, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1469, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1436, § 9, effective July 1; (1.5) added, p. 1241, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 392, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1586, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1905, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) and IP(1.5)(a) amended, p. 254, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1821, § 15, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 97-1003, House Bill 97-1125, and House Bill 97-1301 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 295, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

42-7-407. Duty of courts to report.

The clerk of a court or the judge of a court which has no clerk shall forward to the director a certified record of any judgment for damages, the rendering and nonpayment of which judgment requires the director to suspend the license and registrations in the name of the judgment debtor under this article. This record shall be forwarded to the director immediately upon the expiration of thirty days after such judgment becomes final and when such judgment has not been stayed or satisfied within the amounts specified in this article, as shown by the records of the court.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2482, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-408. Proof of financial responsibility - methods of giving proof - duration - exception.

Proof of financial responsibility for the future, when required under this article, may be given by the following alternate methods:

Proof that a policy of liability insurance has been obtained and is in full force and effect or that a bond has been duly executed or that deposit has been made of money; or

Securities as provided in section 42-7-418.

Proof of financial responsibility for the future in the amounts provided in section 42-7-103 (14) shall be maintained for three years from the date last required and shall be furnished for each motor vehicle registered during that period; except that, if during such three-year period the insured has not been licensed to drive pursuant to this title, the insured shall be credited with the nonlicensed time toward the three-year period.

Notwithstanding the three-year requirement in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1):

If an insured has been found guilty of DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI or if the insured's license has been revoked pursuant to section 42-2-126, other than a revocation under section 42-2-126 (3)(b) or (3)(e), only one time and no accident was involved in such offense, proof of financial responsibility for the future shall be required to be maintained only for as long as the insured's driving privilege is ordered to be under restraint, up to a maximum of three years. The time period for maintaining the future proof of liability insurance shall begin at the time the driver reinstates his or her driving privilege.

If an insured has been found guilty of a second or subsequent offense of UDD with a BAC of at least 0.02 but not more than 0.05 or if the insured's driver's license has been revoked because of a second or subsequent offense pursuant to section 42-2-126 (3)(b) or (3)(e), proof of financial responsibility for the future shall be required to be maintained only for as long as the insured's driving privilege is ordered to be under restraint. The time period for maintaining the future proof of liability insurance shall begin at the time the driver reinstates his or her driving privilege.

The term of the policy of liability insurance or the bond submitted as proof of financial responsibility for the future shall be for a minimum of three months.

If an insured's driver's license is cancelled pursuant to section 42-2-125 (4), and after such cancellation neither a court of competent jurisdiction nor an administrative hearing officer determines that the charges have been proved, the insured shall not be required to comply with the proof of financial responsibility requirements stated in this section.

If at any time when insurance is required to be maintained in accordance with section 42-4-1409 or this article it is not so maintained or becomes invalid, the director shall suspend the driver's license of the person who has not maintained the required insurance and shall not reinstate the license of such person until future proof of financial responsibility is provided in accordance with section 42-7-406 (1).

Repealed.

Upon receipt of evidence from an agency of another state or foreign jurisdiction that a former Colorado resident has obtained a license in such state or foreign jurisdiction, the director shall suspend the requirement for proof of financial responsibility for the future until such time as the former resident has made application for a new Colorado license.

If such former resident makes application for a Colorado driver's license, the director shall reinstate the requirement for proof of financial responsibility for the future until such time as the original requirement to maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future has expired.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2482, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 709, § 6, effective May 23.

L. 96:

(1)(c) amended and (4) and (5) added, p. 1211, § 9, effective June 1.

L. 97:

(6) added, p. 338, § 1, effective April 19; (1)(c) and (5) amended, p. 1388, § 10, effective July 1; (1)(c) amended, p. 1470, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(c)(II) amended, p. 176, § 8, effective April 6.

L. 2008:

(1)(c) amended, p. 254, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(c)(I) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1887, § 19, effective May 28.

42-7-409. Proof for member of family or chauffeur.

Whenever the director determines that any person required to give proof by reason of a conviction is not the owner of a motor vehicle but was at the time of such conviction a chauffeur or motor vehicle operator, however designated, in the employ of an owner of a motor vehicle or a member of the immediate family or household of the owner of a motor vehicle, the director shall accept proof of financial responsibility given by such owner in lieu of proof given by such other person so long as such latter person is operating a motor vehicle for which the owner has given proof as provided in this article. No such license shall be reinstated and no new license issued until otherwise permitted under the laws of this state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2482, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-410. Certificate for insurance policy.

Proof of financial responsibility may be made by filing with the director the written certificate of any insurance carrier duly authorized to do business in this state, certifying that it has issued to or for the benefit of the person furnishing such proof and named as the insured a motor vehicle liability policy or in certain events an operator's policy, meeting the requirements of this article, and that said policy is then in full force and effect. Such certificate shall give the dates of issuance and expiration of such policy and shall explicitly describe all motor vehicles covered thereby, unless the policy is issued to a person who is not the owner of a motor vehicle.

The director shall not accept any certificate unless the same covers all motor vehicles registered in the name of the person furnishing such proof as owner and an additional certificate shall be required as a condition precedent to the subsequent registration of any motor vehicle or motor vehicles in the name of the person giving such proof as owner.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2483, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1211, § 10, effective July 1.

42-7-411. Restrictions in certain type of policy.

When a certificate is filed showing that a policy has been issued covering all motor vehicles owned by the insured but not insuring such person when operating any motor vehicle not owned by that person, it is unlawful for such person to operate any motor vehicle not owned by that person or not covered by such certificate.

In the event the owner of the motor vehicle desires to be relieved of the restriction stated in subsection (1) of this section and to be permitted to drive any other motor vehicle, the owner may have such restrictions removed upon filing a certificate showing that there has been issued to the owner a policy of insurance insuring the owner as insured against liability imposed by law upon such an insured for bodily injury to or death of any person or damage to property to the amounts and limits as provided under section 42-7-103 (14) with respect to any motor vehicle operated by the insured and which otherwise complies with the requirements of this article with respect to such type of policy. Such policy is referred to in this article as an operator's policy.

When the person required to give proof of financial responsibility is not the owner of a motor vehicle, then an operator's policy of the type and coverage described in subsection (2) of this section shall be sufficient under this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2483, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-412. Certificate furnished by nonresident.

The nonresident owner of a foreign vehicle may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the director a written certificate of an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state in which the motor vehicle described in such certificate is registered or if such nonresident does not own a motor vehicle then in the state in which the insured resides and otherwise conforming to the provisions of this article, and the director shall accept the same upon condition that said insurance carrier complies with the following provisions of this section:

Said insurance carrier shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the director to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in this state.

Said insurance carrier shall duly adopt a resolution which shall be binding upon it, declaring that its policies shall be deemed to be varied to comply with the law of this state relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued in this article.

Said insurance carrier shall also agree to accept as final and binding any final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction in this state duly rendered in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident.

If any foreign insurance carrier which has qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility defaults in any of said undertakings or agreements, the director shall not subsequently accept any certificate of said carrier, whether previously filed or subsequently tendered, as proof of financial responsibility so long as such default continues.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2483, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-413. Motor vehicle liability policy.

"Motor vehicle liability policy", as used in this article, means a policy of liability insurance issued by an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in this state to or for the benefit of the person named therein as insured, which policy shall meet the following requirements:

The policy of liability insurance shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles with respect to which coverage is thereby intended to be granted.

The policy of liability insurance shall insure the person named therein and any other person using or responsible for the use of said motor vehicle with the express or implied permission of said insured.

The policy of liability insurance shall insure every such person on account of the maintenance, use, or operation of the motor vehicle within the continental limits of the United States or Canada against loss from the liability imposed by law; for damages, including damages for care and loss of services arising from such maintenance, use, or operation to the extent and aggregate amount, exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each such motor vehicle, in the amounts specified in section 42-7-103 (2).

When an operator's policy of liability insurance is required, it shall insure the person named therein as insured against the liability imposed by law upon the insured for bodily injury to or death of any person or damage to property to the amounts and limits set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section and growing out of the use or operation by the insured within the continental limits of the United States or Canada of any motor vehicle not owned by the insured.

Any liability policy issued under this section need not cover any liability of the insured assumed by or imposed upon said insured under any workers' compensation law nor any liability for damage to property in charge of the insured or the insured's employees.

Any such policy of liability insurance may grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified in this section or contain any agreements, provisions, or stipulations not in conflict with the provisions of this article and not otherwise contrary to law.

Any motor vehicle liability policy which by endorsement contains the provisions required under this section shall be sufficient proof of ability to respond in damages.

The department may accept several policies of one or more such carriers which together meet the requirements of this section.

Any binder pending the issuance of any policy of liability insurance, which binder contains or by reference includes the provisions under this section, shall be sufficient proof of ability to respond in damages.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2484, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-414. Requirements to be complied with.

Except as provided in section 42-7-417, no motor vehicle liability policy or operator's policy of liability insurance shall be issued in this state unless and until all of the requirements of subsection (2) of this section are met.

Every motor vehicle liability policy and every operator's policy of liability insurance accepted as proof under this article shall be subject to the following provisions whether or not contained therein:

The liability of the insurance carrier under any such policy shall become absolute whenever loss or damage covered by such policy occurs, and the satisfaction by the insured of a final judgment for such loss or damage shall not be a condition precedent to the right or obligation of the carrier to make payment on account of such loss or damage. No fraud, misrepresentation, or other act of the insured in obtaining or retaining any such policy, or in adjusting a claim under any such policy, and no failure of the insured to give any notice, forward any paper, or otherwise cooperate with the insurance carrier shall constitute a defense as against the judgment creditor on any such judgment. The insurance carrier shall not be liable on any such judgment if it has not had reasonable notice of an opportunity to appear in and defend the action in which such judgment was rendered or if the judgment was obtained through collusion between the judgment creditor and the insured.

The insurance carrier shall have the right to settle any claim covered by the policy, and if such settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the limits of liability specified in the policy.

No such policy shall be cancelled except as provided in this section and section 42-7-416. The notice of cancellation shall be delivered to the named insured in person or mailed by certified mail, post-office receipt secured, or by registered mail prior to such cancellation. Unless the contract or policy of insurance provides for a shorter period of notice, said notice shall be so delivered or mailed to the address shown in the policy not less than thirty days prior to the date of cancellation. Proof of such mailing shall be sufficient proof of cancellation. Failure by any insurer to comply with the provisions for cancellation in this section and section 42-7-416 shall render invalid any such cancellation.

No such policy shall be cancelled or annulled as respects any loss or damage by any agreement between the carrier and the insured after the said insured has become responsible for such loss or damage, and any such cancellation or annulment shall be void.

The policy may provide that the insured, or any other person covered by the policy, shall reimburse the insurance carrier for payment made on account of any loss or damage claim or suit involving a breach of the terms, provisions, or conditions of the policy. If the policy provides for limits in excess of the limits specified in section 42-7-103 (14), the insurance carrier may plead against any plaintiff, with respect to the amount of such excess limits of liability, any defenses which it may be entitled to plead against the insured, and any such policy may further provide for the prorating of the insurance thereunder with other applicable valid and collectible insurance.

The policy, the written application therefor, if any, and any rider or endorsement which does not conflict with the provisions of this article shall constitute the entire contract between the parties.

When any insurance carrier authorized to do business within the state of Colorado issues a policy of automobile insurance insuring against bodily injury, death, or injury to or destruction of property or showing financial responsibility, except a binder, a complete copy of the insurance policy shall be transmitted to the purchaser within thirty days of the purchase thereof; except that, when such policy is renewed, only a copy of the notice of renewal shall be required. Mailing of the copy of the policy to the address of the purchaser as given at the time of purchase shall be deemed to be a transmittal as required by this section.

The insurance carrier that issues a motor vehicle liability policy accepted as proof under this article shall include the following provision in the policy contract: "If the insured's whereabouts for service of process cannot be determined through reasonable effort, the insured agrees to designate and irrevocably appoint the insurance carrier as the agent of the insured for service of process, pleadings, or other filings in a civil action brought against the insured or to which the insured has been joined as a defendant or respondent in any Colorado court if the cause of action concerns an incident for which the insured can possibly claim coverage. Subsequent termination of the insurance policy does not affect the appointment for an incident that occurred when the policy was in effect. The insured agrees that any such civil action may be commenced against the insured by the service of process upon the insurance carrier as if personal service had been made directly on the insured. The insurance carrier agrees to forward all communications related to service of process to the last-known e-mail and mailing address of the policyholder in order to coordinate any payment of claims or defense of claims that are required."

If service of process is made on the insurance carrier under this subsection (3), the plaintiff shall cause the service of process to be made on the insurance carrier's registered agent.

If service is obtained under this section, the venue for the underlying claim is the same as if the defendant is a nonresident.

Except as expressly provided in this subsection (3), this subsection (3) does not alter or expand the terms and conditions of the insurance policy or liability coverage.

In the contract provision required by this subsection (3), the name of the insurance carrier issuing the policy shall be substituted for the phrase "The insurance carrier."

If service of process is made on the insurance carrier under this subsection (3) and the court enters judgment or the insurance carrier agrees to a settlement for the damages caused by the absent insured, the amount of the insurance carrier's liability shall not exceed the policy limits of the coverage. A judgment or settlement obtained using service of process on the carrier shall not bar the injured person from subsequently making personal service on the person who caused the injury and seeking additional remedies provided by law.

Payment under the policy pursuant to this section shall not be deemed to be an admission of liability by the alleged tortfeasor and shall not prejudice the right of the alleged tortfeasor to contest his or her liability or the extent of damages owed to the injured party.

As used in this subsection (3), "reasonable effort" means service at the defendant's last-known address, an address obtained from the insurance policy, an address obtained from a driver's license or motor vehicle registration, or any readily ascertainable successor address.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2485, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (HB 10-1164), ch. 196, p. 847, § 3, effective January 1, 2011.

42-7-415. When insurance carrier to issue certificate.

An insurance carrier which has issued a motor vehicle liability policy or an operator's policy of liability insurance meeting the requirements of this article shall upon request of the insured therein deliver to the insured for filing or at the request of the insured shall file directly with the director an appropriate certificate showing that such policy has been issued, which certificate shall meet the requirements of this article. The issuance and delivery or filing of such a certificate shall be conclusive evidence that every policy therein recited has been duly issued and complies with the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2486, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-416. Notice required upon cancellation.

When an insurance carrier has certified a motor vehicle liability policy under this article, it shall give written notice to the director during the ten-day period immediately following the effective date of the cancellation of such policy stating that the policy has been cancelled.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2486, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1212, § 11, effective July 1.

42-7-417. Article not to affect other policies.

This article shall not be held to apply to or affect policies of automobile insurance against liability which may be required by any other law of this state, and such policies, if endorsed to conform to the requirements of this article, shall be accepted as proof of financial responsibility when required under this article.

This article shall not be held to apply to or affect policies insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance, operation, or use of motor vehicles not owned by the insured by persons in the insured's employ or on the insured's behalf.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2486, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-418. Money - securities for financial responsibility.

A person may give proof of financial responsibility by delivering to the director money in an amount or securities approved by said director and of a market value in a total amount as would be required for coverage in a motor vehicle liability policy furnished by the person giving such proof under this article. Such securities shall be of a type which may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds.

All money or securities so deposited shall be subject to execution to satisfy any judgment mentioned in this article but shall not otherwise be subject to attachment or execution.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2487, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Cross references:

For permitted investments by savings and loan association, see § 11-41-114; for fiduciary investments, see part 3 of article 1 of title 15.

42-7-419. Substitution of proof.

The director shall cancel any bond or return any certificate of insurance or the director shall direct and the state treasurer shall return any money or securities to the person entitled thereto, upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2487, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-420. Failure of proof - other proof.

Whenever any evidence of proof of ability to respond in damages filed by any person under the provisions of this article no longer fulfills the purpose for which required, the director, for the purpose of this article, shall require other evidence of ability to respond in damages as required by this article and shall suspend the license of such person pending such proof.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2487, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-7-421. When director may release proof of financial responsibility.

The director, upon request, shall cancel any bond or return any certificate of insurance, or the director shall direct and the state treasurer shall return to the person entitled thereto any money or securities deposited pursuant to this article as proof of financial responsibility, or waive the requirement of filing proof of financial responsibility in any of the following events:

At any time after three years from the date such proof was required, or after any other period during which proof was required pursuant to section 42-7-408 (1) in the case of certain violations for an alcohol-related driving offense, if, during such three-year or other period preceding the request, the person furnishing such proof has not been convicted of any offense referred to in section 42-7-406; or

In the event of the death of the person on whose behalf such proof was filed, or the permanent incapacity of such person to operate a motor vehicle; or

In the event the person who has given proof of financial responsibility surrenders the person's license to the director, but the director shall not release such proof in the event any action for damages upon a liability referred to in this article is then pending or any judgment upon any such liability is then outstanding and unsatisfied or in the event the director has received notice that such person has within the period of three months immediately preceding been involved as a driver in any motor vehicle accident. An affidavit of the applicant of the nonexistence of such facts shall be sufficient evidence thereof in the absence of evidence to the contrary in the records of the department.

Whenever any person to whom proof has been surrendered, as provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, applies for a license within a period of three years from the date proof of financial responsibility was originally required, or within any other period during which proof of financial responsibility was required pursuant to section 42-7-408 (1), any such application shall be refused unless the applicant establishes such proof for the remainder of such period.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2487, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 710, § 7, effective May 23.

42-7-422. No proof when proof required.

Any person whose license or other privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended, cancelled, or revoked, and restoration thereof or issuance of a new license is contingent upon the furnishing of proof of financial responsibility for the future, and who, during such suspension or revocation or in the absence of proper authorization from the director, drives any motor vehicle upon any highway in Colorado except as permitted under this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days nor more than six months and, in the discretion of the court, a fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars may be imposed. The minimum sentence imposed by this section shall be mandatory, and the court shall not grant probation or a suspended sentence, in whole or in part, or reduce or suspend the fine, except in a case where the defendant has established that the defendant had to drive the motor vehicle in violation of this section because of an emergency, in which case the mandatory jail sentence does not apply. Such minimum sentence need not be five consecutive days but may be served during any thirty-day period.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2488, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.